Virginia statutes. Title 30. General Assembly.
Chapter 3.2. Division of Legislative Automated Systems.

§ 30-34.11.
Division created; appointment and tenure of Director.

There shall be a legislative agency known and designated as the Division of Legislative Automated Systems. The Division shall be in the charge of a Director, who shall be appointed by, subject to confirmation by the General Assembly, and serve at the pleasure of the Committees on Rules of the House of Delegates and the Senate acting jointly.

History.

1980, c. 725.

The numbers of §§ 30-34.11 through 30-34.14

were assigned by the Virginia Code Commission, the numbers in the 1980 act having been 30-34.1 through 30-34.4.

§ 30-34.12.
Powers and duties of Director.

The Director of the Division of Legislative Automated Systems shall, under the direction and control of the Committees on Rules of the House of Delegates and the Senate acting jointly, exercise such powers and perform such duties as are conferred or imposed by law upon him; and he shall perform such other duties as may be required of him by the Committees on Rules of the House of Delegates and the Senate acting jointly.

History.

1980, c. 725.

§ 30-34.13.
General powers of Division.

The Division shall have the following general powers:

To employ such personnel as may be required to carry out the purposes of this chapter.

To make and enter into all contracts and agreements necessary or incidental to the performance of its duties and the execution of its powers under this chapter, including, but not limited to, contracts with the United States, other states, and agencies and governmental subdivisions of Virginia.

To do all acts necessary or convenient to carry out the purposes of this chapter.

History.

1980, c. 725.

§ 30-34.14.
Duties of Division.

The Division shall have the following duties:

Operate an automated data processing center and perform computing and programming services for the House of Delegates, Senate of Virginia, and the Division of Legislative Services.

To provide technical assistance to the General Assembly of Virginia, and to the agencies which directly serve the General Assembly of Virginia.

To represent the interests of the General Assembly in activities involving, obtaining and maintaining data processing services, electronic components, and other related items.

Prepare and publish annually, as soon as practicable after January 1, a listing of designated spokespersons or information officers for each department, agency, board, or commission of state government, as shall be designated by the head thereof. Such officers or designated alternates shall (i) serve as legislative liaison between any such department, agency, board, or commission and the General Assembly, (ii) act as the official spokesperson representing such department, agency, board, or commission, and (iii) be at all times available to assist members of the General Assembly in seeking solutions to problems of citizens of the Commonwealth.

To perform other duties as directed by the Committees on Rules of the House of Delegates and the Senate of Virginia acting jointly.

Every document or file maintained or stored on equipment of the Division shall be considered the property of the person for whom the document or file is maintained or stored. Neither the Director nor any employee of the Division shall reveal any of this property to any person outside of the Division, except with the consent of the owner of the property.

History.

1980, c. 725; 2002, c. 2; 2006, c. 662.

The 2002 amendments.

The 2002 amendment by c. 2, effective February 10, 2002, added the last paragraph.

The 2006 amendments.

The 2006 amendment by c. 662 added subdivision 4 and redesignated former subdivision 4 as subdivision 5.

§ 30-34.15.
Submission of reports and executive summaries to the legislative branch.

Any report required or requested by law or resolution to be submitted to the General Assembly shall be submitted to the Division of Legislative Automated Systems in a written or electronic format as provided in the procedures for the processing of legislative documents. Such submission shall satisfy the requirement for communication to the General Assembly.

Any report required or requested by law or resolution to be submitted to any committee, subcommittee, commission, agency, or other body within the legislative branch or to the chairman or agency head of such entity shall also be submitted to the Division of Legislative Automated Systems in a written or electronic format as provided in the procedures for the processing of legislative documents and reports.

The reports submitted to the Division of Legislative Automated Systems shall include an executive summary. The Division shall post the executive summary and the report on the website of the General Assembly and develop a notification process to inform interested persons of such postings. Any requirement for a separate executive summary may be satisfied by the submission of a report in a written or electronic format with an executive summary.

The Director of the Division of Legislative Automated Systems and the publishing authority may enter into agreements to provide equivalent access to the report or the information contained in the report and such access shall satisfy the submission requirement of this section.

Nothing in this section shall be construed to require the release of information otherwise held confidential by law.

History.

2003, c. 941; 2004, c. 650; 2005, c. 633; 2012, c. 434.

The 2004 amendments.

The 2004 amendment by c. 650 added “and develop a noification process to inform interested persons of such postings” to the end of subsection C.

The 2005 amendments.

The 2005 amendment by c. 633, in subsection C, substituted “an” for “a separate” preceding “executive summary” and added the last sentence; inserted present subsection D; and redesignated former subsection D as subsection E.

The 2012 amendments.

The 2012 amendment by c. 434 inserted “in a written or electronic format” in the first sentence of subsection A, in subsection B, and in the third sentence of subsection C.